New York, session 2025-2026, S5555.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 240.20 of the penal law is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 § 240.20 Disorderly conduct. 4 A person is guilty of disorderly conduct when, with intent to cause 5 public inconvenience, annoyance or alarm, or recklessly creating a risk 6 thereof such person: 7 1. [He] engages in fighting or in violent, tumultuous or threatening 8 behavior; or 9 2. [He] makes unreasonable noise; or 10 3. [In] in a public place, [he] uses abusive or obscene language, or 11 makes an obscene gesture; or 12 4. [Without] without lawful authority, [he] disturbs any lawful assem- 13 bly or meeting of persons; or 14 5. [He] obstructs vehicular or pedestrian traffic; or 15 6. [He] congregates with other persons in a public place and refuses 16 to comply with a lawful order of the police to disperse; or 17 7. [He] creates a hazardous or physically offensive condition by any 18 act which serves no legitimate purpose[.], including, but not limited, 19 littering; or 20 8. urinates or defecates in a public place; or 21 9. smokes any substance in a prohibited area; or 22 10. possesses an open container of alcohol in a public place; or 23 11. smokes marihuana in a public place; or 24 12. disobeys signage in any municipal or state park, including but not 25 limited to, printed notices and placards. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09415-01-5 S. 5555 2 1 For the purposes of this section, the term "public place" shall mean a 2 place to which the public or a substantial group of persons has access 3 including, but not limited to, any highway, street, road, sidewalk, 4 parking area, shopping area, place of amusement, playground, park or 5 beach, except that the definition of a public place shall not include 6 those premises duly licensed for the sale and consumption of alcoholic 7 beverages on the premises or within their own private property. Such 8 public place shall also include the interior of any stationary motor 9 vehicle which is on any highway, street, road, parking area, shopping 10 area, playground, park or beach located within the city. 11 Disorderly conduct is a violation. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 13 have become a law.